Rhode Island statutes. Title 11 Criminal Offenses
Chapter 12 Dueling and Fighting

11-12-1.
Engaging in duel.

Every person who shall voluntarily engage in a duel with any dangerous weapon, to the hazard of life, shall be imprisoned not exceeding seven (7) years nor less than one year.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 277, § 7; G.L. 1909, ch. 343, § 7; G.L. 1923, ch. 395, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 606, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

11-12-1

.

11-12-2.
Challenging or accepting challenge to duel.

Every person who shall challenge another to fight a duel with any dangerous weapon, to the hazard of life, and every person who shall accept a challenge to fight such duel, although no duel be fought, shall be imprisoned not exceeding seven (7) years nor less than one year.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 277, § 8; G.L. 1909, ch. 343, § 8; G.L. 1923, ch. 395, § 8; G.L. 1938, ch. 606, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

11-12-2

.

11-12-3.
Duel without state resulting in death within state.

Every person, being an inhabitant of or resident in this state, who shall fight a duel outside the jurisdiction of this state, by previous appointment or engagement made within this state, and in the duel shall inflict a mortal wound upon any person of which the person so injured shall afterwards die within this state, shall be deemed to be guilty of murder within this state and may be indicted or charged by information, tried, convicted and sentenced in the county in which the death shall happen.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 277, § 9; G.L. 1909, ch. 343, § 9; G.L. 1923, ch. 395, § 9; G.L. 1938, ch. 606, § 9; G.L. 1956, §

11-12-3

; P.L. 1974, ch. 118, § 4.

11-12-4.
Seconding fatal duel outside state.

Every person being an inhabitant of or resident in this state who shall, by previous appointment or engagement made within this state, be the second of either party in any duel as is mentioned in §

11-12-3

and shall be present as the second when the mortal wound is inflicted, of which death shall ensue within this state, shall be deemed to be an accessory before the fact to the crime of murder within this state, and may be indicted or charged by information, tried, convicted and sentenced within the county where the death shall happen.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 277, § 10; G.L. 1909, ch. 343, § 10; G.L. 1923, ch. 395, § 10; G.L. 1938, ch. 606, § 10; G.L. 1956, §

11-12-4

; P.L. 1974, ch. 118, § 4.

11-12-5.
Plea of former jeopardy.

Any person indicted under either §

11-12-3

or

11-12-4

may plead a former conviction or acquittal of the same offense in the state or county in which the duel was fought, and that plea, if admitted or established, shall bar all further proceedings against the person for the same offense within this state.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 277, § 11; G.L. 1909, ch. 343, § 11; G.L. 1923, ch. 395, § 11; G.L. 1938, ch. 606, § 11; G.L. 1956, §

11-12-5

.

11-12-6.
Fighting by appointment.

Every person who shall, by previous appointment or arrangement, meet another person and engage in a fight, shall be imprisoned not more than ten (10) years or be fined not exceeding five thousand dollars ($5,000).

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 277, § 12; G.L. 1909, ch. 343, § 12; G.L. 1923, ch. 395, § 12; G.L. 1938, ch. 606, § 12; G.L. 1956, §

11-12-6

.

11-12-7.
Aiding fight by appointment.

Every person who shall be present at any fight as provided in §

11-12-6

as an aid, second or surgeon, or who shall advise, encourage or promote the fight, shall be imprisoned not more than five (5) years or be fined not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000).

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 277, § 13; G.L. 1909, ch. 343, § 13; G.L. 1923, ch. 395, § 13; G.L. 1938, ch. 606, § 13; G.L. 1956, §

11-12-7

.

11-12-8.
Leaving state to fight by appointment.

Every person who shall, by previous appointment or engagement, leave this state and engage in a fight with another person outside the limits of this state shall be imprisoned not more than five (5) years or be fined not exceeding five thousand dollars ($5,000), and may be indicted or charged by information, tried, convicted and sentenced in any county in this state.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 277, § 14; G.L. 1909, ch. 343, § 14; G.L. 1923, ch. 395, § 14; G.L. 1938, ch. 606, § 14; G.L. 1956, §

11-12-8

; P.L. 1974, ch. 118, § 4.

11-12-9.
Arrest of fighters.

A deputy sheriff, town sergeant, town constable, or police officer shall immediately arrest in any county any person violating any of the provisions of §§

11-12-6

—

11-12-8

, and shall detain the person until a warrant can be obtained for his or her arrest.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 277, § 15; G.L. 1909, ch. 343, § 15; G.L. 1923, ch. 395, § 15; G.L. 1938, ch. 606, § 15; G.L. 1956, §

11-12-9

; P.L. 2012, ch. 324, § 31; P.L. 2015, ch. 260, § 13; P.L. 2015, ch. 275, § 13.